testing/sma-adj.yaml
  Adjective - åemie: # 
    åemie+A+Attr: åemie 

  Adjective - åenehks: # c 
    åenehks+A+Attr: [åenehks, åenehke]
    åenehks+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [åenebe, åeniehkabpa, åeniehkåbpoe]
    åenehks+A+Sg+Nom: [åenehks, åenehke]
    åenehks+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [åenemes, åeniehkommes]

  Adjective - åålijes: # 
    åålijes+A+Attr: [åålijes, åålijes]
    åålijes+A+Sg+Nom: åålijes 

  Adjective - åårmege: # 
    åårmege+A+Attr: åårmege 
    åårmege+A+Sg+Nom: åårmege 

  Adjective - åårmehke: # 
    åårmehke+A+Attr: åårmehke 
    åårmehke+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [åårmehkabpa, åårmehkåbpoe]
    åårmehke+A+Sg+Nom: åårmehke 
    åårmehke+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: åårmehkommes

  Adjective - ïskeres: # 
    ïskeres+A+Attr: ïskeres 
    ïskeres+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [ïskerabpa, ïskeråbpoe]
    ïskeres+A+Sg+Nom: [ïskeres, ïskere]
    ïskeres+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: ïskerommes

  Adjective - övtebe: # 
    övtebe+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: övtebe 
    övtebe+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: övtemes

  Adjective - ööjeldihks: # 
    ööjeldihks+A+Attr: ööjeldihks 
    ööjeldihks+A+Sg+Nom: ööjeldihks 
